Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2630
Attorney General; enforcement powers.

The Attorney General, for the enforcement of the Competitive Livestock Markets Act, shall have the authority to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, examine them under oath, and require the production of documents, records, or tangible things deemed relevant to the proper performance of his or her duties. Service of any subpoena shall be made in the manner prescribed by the rules of civil procedure.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 30.